Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 21 Agricultural Liming Materials

2-21-1.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island agricultural liming materials law”.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-2.
Responsibility for administration.

This chapter shall be administered by the director of the department of environmental management, referred to as the director.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Agricultural liming materials” means a product whose calcium and magnesium compounds are capable of neutralizing soil acidity.

“Brand” means the term, designation, trademark, product name or other specific designation under which individual agricultural liming material is offered for sale.

“Bulk” means in nonpackaged form.

“Burnt lime” means a material made from limestone which consists essentially of calcium oxide or a combination of calcium oxide with magnesium oxide.

“Calcium carbonate equivalent” means the acid neutralizing capacity of an agricultural liming material expressed as weight percentage of calcium carbonate.

“Fineness” means the percentage by weight of the material which will pass U.S. standard sieves of specific sizes. The director shall promulgate regulations relating to fineness and shall be guided by the American society for testing and materials (ASTM)
specification for sieve sizes.

“Hydrated lime” means a material, made from burnt lime, which consists essentially of calcium hydroxide or a combination of calcium hydroxide with magnesium oxide and/or magnesium hydroxide.

“Industrial byproduct” means any industrial waste or byproduct containing calcium or calcium and magnesium in forms that will neutralize soil acidity.

“Label” means any written or printed matter on or attached to the package or on the delivery ticket which accompanies bulk shipments.

“Limestone” means a material consisting essentially of calcium carbonate or a combination of calcium carbonate with magnesium carbonate capable of neutralizing soil acidity.

“Marl” means a granular or loosely consolidated earthy material composed largely of sea shell fragments and calcium carbonate.

“Percent” or “Percentage” means by weight.

“Person” means individual, partnership, association, firm or corporation.

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois.

“Weight” means the weight of undried material as offered for sale.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-4.
Labeling.

Agricultural liming materials sold, offered or exposed for sale in the state shall have affixed to each package in a conspicuous manner on their outside, a plainly printed, stamped or otherwise marked label, tag or statement, or in the case of bulk sales,
a delivery slip, setting forth at least the following information:

The name and principal office address of the manufacturer or distributor;

The brand or trade name of the material;

The identification of the product as to the type of the agricultural liming material;

The net weight of the agricultural liming material;

The minimum percentage of calcium oxide and magnesium oxide. Additional guarantees for calcium carbonate and magnesium carbonate are allowed;

Calcium carbonate equivalent as determined by methods prescribed by the association of official analytical chemists. Minimum calcium carbonate equivalents as prescribed by regulation; and

The minimum percent by weight passing through U.S. standard sieves as prescribed by regulations.

No information or statement shall appear on any package, label, delivery slip or advertising matter which is false or misleading to the purchaser as to the quality, analysis, type or composition of the agricultural liming material.

In the case of any material which has been adulterated subsequent to packaging, labeling or loading of the material and before delivery to the consumer, a plainly marked notice to that effect shall be affixed by the vendor to the package or delivery slip
to identify the kind and degree of the adulteration in the material.

At every site from which agricultural liming materials delivered in bulk and at every place where consumer orders for bulk deliveries are placed, there shall be conspicuously posted a copy of the statement required by this section for each brand of material.

When the director finds, after a public hearing following due notice, that the requirement for expressing the calcium and magnesium in elemental form would not impose an economic hardship on distributors and users of agricultural liming material by reason
of conflicting labeling requirements among the state he or she may require by regulation that the minimum percentage of calcium oxide and magnesium oxide and/or calcium carbonate and magnesium carbonate shall be expressed in the
following form:

Provided that the effective date of the regulation is be not less than six (6) months following the issuance of the regulation, and that for a period of two (2) years following the effective date of the regulation the equivalent of calcium and magnesium
may also be shown in the form of calcium oxide and magnesium oxide and/or calcium carbonate and magnesium carbonate.

Total calcium (Ca) percent Total magnesium (Mg) percent

Click to view

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-5.
Prohibited acts.

No agricultural liming material shall be sold or offered for sale in this state unless it complies with provisions of this chapter or regulations.

No agricultural liming material shall be sold or offered for sale in this state which contains toxic materials in quantities injurious to plants or animals.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-6.
Registration.

Each separately identified product shall be registered before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted to the director on forms furnished by the director and shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00)
per product. Upon approval by the director, a copy of the registration shall be furnished to the applicant. All registrations expire on December 31st of each year.

A distributor is not required to register any brand of agricultural liming material which is already registered under this chapter by another person, providing the label does not differ in any respect.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-7.
Reporting of tonnage.

Within thirty (30) days following the expiration of registration, each registrant shall submit on forms furnished by the director an annual statement under oath for the twelve (12) month period ending the calendar year, setting forth the number of net
tons of each agricultural liming material sold by him for use in the state during that calendar year. No tonnage fee is required on agricultural liming materials being offered for sale in this state.

The director shall publish and distribute annually, to each agricultural liming material registrant or other interested persons a composite report showing the tons of agricultural liming material sold in the state. This report shall in no way divulge
the operation of any registrant.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-8.
Inspection, sampling, analysis.

It is the duty of the director, who may act through his or her authorized agent, to sample, inspect, make analyses, and test agricultural liming materials distributed within this state as he or she deems necessary to determine whether those agricultural
liming materials are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter. The director, individually or through his or her agent, is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises or carriers during regular business hours
in order to have access to agricultural liming material subject to the provisions of this chapter and regulations pertaining to agricultural liming material, and to the records relating to their distribution.

The methods of analysis and sampling are those approved by the director, and shall be guided by association of official analytical chemists procedures.

The results of official analysis of agricultural liming materials and portions of official samples shall be distributed, upon request, by the director as provided in the regulations at least annually.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-9.
Stop sale, use, or removal orders.

The director may issue and enforce a written or printed stop sale, use, or removal order to the owner or custodian of any lot of agricultural liming materials and to hold at a designated place when the director finds that the agricultural liming material
is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter until the law has been complied with and the agricultural liming material is released, in writing, by the director, or the violation has been
otherwise legally disposed of by written authority. The director shall release the agricultural liming materials withdrawn, when the requirements of the provisions of this chapter are complied with and all costs and expense incurred
in connection with the withdrawal are paid.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-10.
Penalties for violations.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter is subject to a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) to be enforced
by a summary proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing in this chapter is construed as requiring the director or his or her authorized agent to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings as
a result of minor violations of the chapter when he or she believes that the public interest will best be served by a suitable written warning.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.

2-21-11.
Rules for administration of agricultural liming material.

The director, after reasonable notice and a hearing, is empowered to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter and to grant exemptions from specific requirements of this chapter as, from time to time, may be deemed
necessary.

History of Section.
P.L. 1977, ch. 164, § 1.